Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
PART 2 Enforcement of Article

26-2-80.
Promulgation of regulations.

The Commissioner is authorized to promulgate, from time to time, such regulations as are necessary to effectuate the purpose of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 31.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Meat Inspection - Meat Processing, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-10-1.

Agricultural Tourist Attraction, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-28-1.

26-2-81.
Powers of Commissioner; access to documentary evidence and witnesses; false reports; failure to file reports.

The Commissioner shall also have power:

To gather and compile information concerning and to investigate from time to time the organization, business, conduct, practices, and management of any person, firm, or corporation subject to this article and the relation thereof to other persons, firms, and corporations; and

To require, by regulation, persons, firms, and corporations subject to this article, or any class of them, to file with the Commissioner, in such form as he may prescribe, annual or special, or both annual and special, reports or answers in writing to specific questions, furnishing to the Commissioner such information as he may require as to the organization, business, conduct, practices, management, and relation to other persons, firms, and corporations of the person, firm, or corporation filing such reports or answers in writing. Such reports and answers shall be made under oath, or otherwise as the Commissioner may prescribe, and shall be filed with the Commissioner within such reasonable period as he may prescribe, unless additional time is granted in any case by the Commissioner.

For the purposes of this article, the Commissioner shall at all reasonable times have access to, for the purpose of examination, and the right to copy any documentary evidence of any person, firm, or corporation being investigated or proceeded against and may require by subpoena the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of all documentary evidence of any person, firm, or corporation relating to any matter under investigation. The Commissioner, hearing officer, or other designate may sign subpoenas and may administer oaths and affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive evidence.

The attendance of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence may be required at any designated place of hearing. In case of disobedience to a subpoena, the Commissioner may apply to the superior court for an order requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence.

The appropriate superior court may, in case of contumacy or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, firm, or corporation, issue an order requiring such person, firm, or corporation to appear before the Commissioner, or to produce documentary evidence if so ordered, or to give evidence touching the matter in question; and any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by such court as a contempt thereof.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation willfully to:

Make, or cause to be made, any false entry or statement of fact in any report required to be made under this article;

Make, or cause to be made, any false entry in any account, record, or memorandum kept by any person, firm, or corporation subject to this article;

Neglect or fail to make, or cause to be made, full, true, and correct entries in such accounts, records, or memoranda of all facts and transactions appertaining to the business of such person, firm, or corporation;

Remove out of the jurisdiction of this state or mutilate, alter, or by any other means falsify or conceal any documentary evidence of any such person, firm, or corporation; or

Refuse to submit to the Commissioner or to any of his authorized agents, for the purpose of inspection and taking copies, any documentary evidence of any such person, firm, or corporation in his possession or within his control.

Any person or the officers or agents of any firm or corporation who violate this subsection shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment of not more than three years or by a fine not to exceed $5,000.00, or both.

If any person, firm, or corporation required by this article to file any annual or special report fails so to do within the time fixed by the Commissioner for filing the report and such failure shall continue for 30 days after notice of such default, such person, firm, or corporation shall forfeit to this state the sum of $100.00 for each and every day of the continuance of such failure, which forfeiture shall be payable into the state treasury and shall be recoverable in a civil action in the name of the state brought in the county where the person, firm, or corporation has his or its principal office or in any county in which he or it shall do business. It shall be the duty of the Attorney General to prosecute for the recovery of such forfeitures.

Information obtained by the Commissioner pursuant to the authority of this article shall not be made public by any officer or employee of this state without the authorization of the Commissioner. Such information and records shall not be subject to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, providing for the inspection of public records.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 27; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 26.

26-2-82.
Administrative penalties; judicial review.

The Commissioner, in order to enforce this article or any orders, rules, and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, may issue an administrative order imposing a penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for each violation whenever the Commissioner, after a hearing, determines that any person has violated this article or any regulations or orders promulgated under this article. The hearing and any administrative review thereof shall be conducted in accordance with the procedure for contested cases under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” Any person who has exhausted all administrative remedies available and who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any final order or action of the Commissioner shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” All penalties recovered as provided for in this article shall be paid into the state treasury. The Commissioner may file in the superior court of the county where the person under order resides or, if said person is a corporation, in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business or in the county wherein the violation occurred a certified copy of a final order of the Commissioner unappealed from, or of a final order of the Commissioner affirmed upon appeal, whereupon said court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though said judgment has been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by said court. The penalty prescribed in this Code section shall be concurrent, alternative, and cumulative with any and all other civil, criminal, or alternative rights, remedies, forfeitures, or penalties provided, allowed, or available to the Commissioner with respect to any violation of this article and any orders, rules, or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1037, § 1.

26-2-83.
Withdrawal of meat inspection service.

The Commissioner is authorized to refuse to provide or to withdraw inspection service under Code Sections 26-2-100 through 26-2-115 and to revoke or suspend any license issued by the Department of Agriculture to any person, firm, or corporation subject to this article who shall violate any of the laws of this state pertaining to the department or any of the rules and regulations of the department promulgated pursuant to such laws, or who is unfit to engage in any business requiring inspection under Code Sections 26-2-100 through 26-2-115 because the applicant or recipient has been convicted in any federal or state court of:

Any felony; or

More than one violation of any law, other than a felony, based upon the acquiring, handling, or distributing of unwholesome, mislabeled, or deceptively packaged food or upon fraud in connection with transactions in food.

This Code section shall not affect in any way other provisions of this article for withdrawal of inspection services under Code Sections 26-2-100 through 26-2-115 from establishments failing to maintain sanitary conditions or to destroy condemned carcasses, parts, meat, or meat food products.

For the purpose of this Code section, a person shall be deemed to be responsibly connected with the business if he was a partner, officer, director, holder, or owner of 10 percent or more of its voting stock or an employee in a managerial or executive capacity.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 21.

26-2-84.
Detention of carcasses, meat, and meat food products suspected of being adulterated or misbranded; removal of official marks.

Whenever any carcass, part of a carcass, meat, or meat food product of cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, or other equines, or any product exempted from the definition of a meat food product, or any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbit, goat, or equine is found by any authorized representative of the Commissioner upon any premises where it is held for purposes of, or during or after, distribution and there is reason to believe that any such article is adulterated or misbranded and is capable of use as human food, or that it has not been inspected, in violation of Part 3 of this article or Title I of the Federal Meat Inspection Act or the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, or that such article or animal has been or is intended to be distributed in violation of any such provisions, it may be detained by such representative for a period not to exceed 20 days, pending action under Code Section 26-2-86 or notification of any federal authorities having jurisdiction over such article or animal; and it shall not be moved by any person, firm, or corporation from the place at which it is located when so detained, until released by such representative. All official marks may be required by such representative to be removed from such article or animal before it is released unless it appears to the satisfaction of the Commissioner that the article or animal is eligible to retain such marks.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 22; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 26; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 13; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 9/SB 364.

26-2-85.
Seizure and condemnation of carcasses, meat, and meat food products; release bond; costs.

Any carcass, part of a carcass, meat, or meat food product of cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbits, goats, horses, mules, or other equines, or any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased cattle, sheep, swine, nontraditional livestock, rabbit, goat, or equine, that is being transported or is held for sale in this state after such transportation, and that is or has been prepared, sold, transported, or otherwise distributed or offered or received for distribution in violation of this article, is capable of use as human food and is adulterated or misbranded, or in any other way is in violation of this article, shall be liable to be proceeded against and seized and condemned, at any time, on an action for condemnation to be brought by the Commissioner in the superior court of the county in which the article or animal is found.

If the article or animal is condemned, it shall, after entry of the decree, be disposed of by destruction or sale as the court may direct. The proceeds, if sold, less the court costs and fees and storage and other proper expenses, shall be paid into the state treasury. The article or animals shall not be sold contrary to the provisions of this article or the Federal Meat Inspection Act or the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

Upon the execution and delivery of a good and sufficient bond conditioned that the article or animal shall not be sold or otherwise disposed of contrary to this article or the laws of the United States, the court may direct that such article or animal be delivered to the owner thereof subject to such supervision by authorized representatives of the Commissioner as is necessary to ensure compliance with the applicable laws.

When a decree of condemnation is entered against the article or animal and it is released under bond or destroyed, court costs and fees and storage and other proper expenses shall be awarded against the person, if any, intervening as claimant of the article or animal.

This Code section shall in no way derogate from authority for condemnation or seizure conferred by other provisions of this article or other laws but shall be cumulative to such other authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 23; Ga. L. 1974, p. 453, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 14; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 10/SB 364.

26-2-86.
Injunctions.

In addition to other remedies provided for in this article, the Commissioner is authorized to apply to the superior court of the appropriate county for an injunction. Such court shall have jurisdiction, upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of this article, notwithstanding whether or not there exists an adequate remedy at law or the fact that the conduct sought to be enjoined is in violation of the criminal provisions of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 24.

26-2-87.
Minor violations.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring the Commissioner to report, for prosecution or for the institution of an action or injunction proceedings, minor violations of this article, whenever he believes that the public interest will be adequately served by a suitable written notice or warning.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, § 26.

26-2-88.
Penalties for fraud or distribution of adulterated articles; penalties for slaughter or distribution of diseased or cancerous animals.

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates this article with intent to defraud or who distributes or attempts to distribute an article that is adulterated, except as defined in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (1) of Code Section 26-2-62, shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than three years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both, provided that no person, firm, or corporation shall be subject to penalties under this subsection for receiving for transportation any article or animal in violation of this article if such receipt was made in good faith, unless such person, firm, or corporation refuses to furnish, on request of a representative of the Commissioner, the name and address of the person from whom he received such article or animal and copies of all documents, if there are any, pertaining to the delivery of the article or animal to him.

Any person who unlawfully slaughters any diseased or cancerous animal for purposes of selling any part of the carcass for human consumption or who knowingly distributes or attempts to distribute any part of such a carcass for human consumption shall be guilty of a felony and punished by imprisonment for not less than three years or more than ten years or by a fine of not less than $10,000.00 or more than $50,000.00, or both.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article for which a penalty is not otherwise prescribed in this article or who violates any rule or regulation promulgated under this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1028, §§ 25, 29; Ga. L. 1982, p. 980, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 26; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 26.

Cross references.

Disposal of dead animals, T. 4, C. 5.

Animals suspected of bearing residue causing contaminated meat, §

26-2-180

et seq.